Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201513-1905
Development districts; certification for funding.

If state funding is available for distribution pursuant to section 13-1906, the Department of Economic Development shall certify development districts for funding eligibility. Certification shall be based on the following requirements:

(1) The development district shall be formed as provided in section 13-1902;

(2) The development district shall have a staff which shall at a minimum include a full-time director to provide assistance to the local governments which are members of the development district; and

(3) The agreement creating the development district shall insure that all of the local governments within the Nebraska planning and development region may at any time join in the development district.

Laws 1992, LB 573, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB661, § 25.